test/src/morphology/V-kandua_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kandua: # Verb 'to carry / kantaa' - full paradigm
      kandua+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: kannan
      kandua+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: kannat
      kandua+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: kandau
      kandua+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: kannammo
      kandua+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: kannatto
      kandua+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: kannetah
      kandua+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kanna
      kandua+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+ScPl3: kanneta
 
      kandua+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: kannoin
      kandua+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: kannoit
      kandua+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: kandoi
      kandua+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: kannoimmo
      kandua+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: kannoitto
      kandua+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: kannettih
      kandua+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kandanuh
      kandua+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl3: kannettu
      
      kandua+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1:  kandazin
      kandua+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2:  kandazit
      kandua+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3:  kandas
      kandua+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1:  kandazimmo
      kandua+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2:  kandazitto
      kandua+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3:  kannettas
      kandua+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kandas
      kandua+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+ScPl3:  kannettas

      kandua+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg1:  kandanuzin
      kandua+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg2:  kandanuzit
      kandua+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg3:  kandanus
      kandua+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl1:  kandanuzimmo
      kandua+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl2:  kandanuzitto
      kandua+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl3:  kannetannus
      kandua+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg: kandanus
      kandua+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl3:  kannetannus

      kandua+V+Pot+ScSg1:  kandanen
      kandua+V+Pot+ScSg2:  kandanet
      kandua+V+Pot+ScSg3:  kandanou
      kandua+V+Pot+ScPl1:  kandanemmo
      kandua+V+Pot+ScPl2:  kandanetto
      kandua+V+Pot+ScPl3:  kannetanneh
      kandua+V+Pot+ConNeg: kandane
      kandua+V+Pot+ConNeg+ScPl3:  kannetanne

      kandua+V+Imprt+ScSg2:  kanna
      kandua+V+Imprt+ScSg3:  kandakkah
      kandua+V+Imprt+ScPl1:  kandakkuammo
      kandua+V+Imprt+ScPl2: [kandakkua, kandakkuatto]
      kandua+V+Imprt+ScPl3:  kannettahes
      kandua+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScSg2: kanna
      kandua+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScSg3: kandakkah
      kandua+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl1: kandakkuammo
      kandua+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl2: kandakkua
      kandua+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl3: kannettahes

      kandua+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kandai
      kandua+V+ActPrfPrc: kandanuh
      kandua+V+PssPrsPrc: kannettavu
      kandua+V+PssPrfPrc: kannettu
      kandua+V+Inf: kandua
 
 
